Utah statutes.
63M-1-2303.   Rural Broadband Service Account created -- Interest -- Costs.

(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the "Rural Broadband Service Account."

(2)  The restricted account shall be funded by money appropriated by the Legislature.

(3) (a)  The state treasurer shall invest money in the account according to Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.

(b)  The Division of Finance shall deposit interest or other earnings derived from investment of account money into the General Fund.

(4)  Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the money deposited into the restricted account in accordance with this section may be expended:

(a)  by the director with the advice of the board to award grants to providers as provided in this part; and

(b)  to cover the costs of administering this part in an amount during any fiscal year not to exceed 2% of the restricted account balance at the start of any fiscal year.



Amended by Chapter 303, 2011 General Session

